Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.060

Office of the superintendent of public instruction—Duties.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, high school, and school district staff and administrators, and the department of children, youth, and families about the GET ready for math and science scholarship program using methods in place for communicating with schools and school districts; and

(2) Provide data showing the race, ethnicity, income, and other available demographic information of students who achieve level four on the math and science high school statewide student assessment; compare those data with comparable information on the student population as a whole; and submit a report with the analysis to the committees responsible for education and higher education in the legislature on December 1st of even-numbered years.

[ 2018 c 58 s 62; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 12; 2007 c 214 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.